Nebraska, session 109, LB421.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 9-1103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-1103 For purposes of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act:
(1) Authorized gaming operator means a person or entity licensed
pursuant to the act to operate games of chance within a licensed
racetrack enclosure;
(2) Authorized gaming operator license means a license to operate
games of chance as an authorized gaming operator at a licensed racetrack
enclosure;
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of this
subdivision, authorized sporting event means a professional sporting
event, a collegiate sporting event, an international sporting event, a
professional motor race event, a professional sports draft, an individual
sports award, an electronic sport, or a simulated game; and
(b) Authorized sporting event does not include an instate collegiate
sporting event in which an instate collegiate or university team is a
participant, a parimutuel wager, a fantasy sports contest, a minor league
sporting event, a sporting event at the high school level or below
regardless of the age of any individual participant, or any sporting
event excluded by the commission;
(4) Collegiate sporting event means an athletic event or competition
of an intercollegiate sport played at the collegiate level for which
eligibility requirements for participation by a student athlete are
established by a national association for the promotion or regulation of
collegiate athletics;
(5) Commission means the State Racing and Gaming Commission;
(6) Designated sports wagering area means an area, as approved by
the commission, in which sports wagering is conducted;
(7) Game of chance means any game which has the elements of chance,
prize, and consideration, including any wager on a slot machine, table
game, counter game, or card game, a keno lottery conducted in accordance
-2-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
with the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, or sports wagering. Game
of chance does not include any game the operation of which is prohibited
at a casino by federal law;
(8) Gaming device means an electronic, mechanical, or other device
which plays a game of chance when activated by a player using currency, a
token, or other item of value;
(9) International sporting event means an international team or
individual sporting event governed by an international sports federation
or sports governing body, including sporting events governed by the
International Olympic Committee and the International Federation of
Association Football;
(10) Licensed racetrack enclosure means all real property licensed
and utilized for the conduct of a race meeting, including the racetrack
and any grandstand, concession stand, office, barn, barn area, employee
housing facility, parking lot, and additional area designated by the
commission in accordance with the Constitution of Nebraska and applicable
Nebraska law;
(11) Limited gaming device means an electronic gaming device which
(a) offers games of chance, (b) does not dispense currency, tokens, or
other items of value, and (c) does not have a cash winnings hopper,
mechanical or simulated spinning reel, or side handle;
(12) Online sports wagering platform means an integrated system of
hardware, software, or applications through which an authorized gaming
operator or its platform provider operates, conducts, or offers sports
wagering through the Internet to persons located within the State of
Nebraska;
(13) Platform provider means a sports wagering vendor that contracts
with an authorized gaming operator to provide an online sports wagering
platform;
(14) (12) Prohibited participant means any individual whose
participation may undermine the integrity of the wagering or the sporting
-3-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
event or any person who is prohibited from sports wagering for other good
cause shown as determined by the commission, including, but not limited
to: (a) Any individual placing a wager as an agent or proxy; (b) any
person who is an athlete, a coach, a referee, or a player placing a wager
on in any sporting event overseen by the sports governing body of such
person based on publicly available information; (c) a person who holds a
paid position of authority or influence sufficient to exert influence
over the participants in a sporting event, including, but not limited to,
any coach, manager, handler, or athletic trainer, or a person with access
to certain types of exclusive information, placing a wager on any
sporting event overseen by the sports governing body of such person based
on publicly available information; or (d) a person identified as
prohibited from sports wagering by any list provided by a sports
governing body to the commission;
(15) (13) Racing license means a license issued for a licensed
racetrack enclosure by the commission; and
(16) (14) Sports wagering means the acceptance of wagers on an
authorized sporting event by any system of wagering as authorized by the
commission. Sports wagering includes, but is not limited to, does not
include (a) placing a wager on the performance or nonperformance of any
individual athlete participating in a single game or match of a
collegiate sporting event in which a collegiate team from this state is
participating, and (b) placing an in-game wager on any game or match of a
collegiate sporting event in which a collegiate team from this state is
participating, (c) placing a wager on the performance or nonperformance
of any individual athlete under eighteen years of age participating in a
professional or international sporting event, or (d) placing a wager on
the performance of athletes in an individual sporting event excluded by
the commission.
Sec. 2. Section 9-1106, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
-4-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
9-1106 The commission shall:
(1) License and regulate authorized gaming operators for the
operation of all games of chance authorized pursuant to the Nebraska
Racetrack Gaming Act, including adopting, promulgating, and enforcing
rules and regulations governing such authorized gaming operators
consistent with the act;
(2) Regulate the operation of games of chance in order to prevent
and eliminate corrupt practices and fraudulent behavior, and thereby
promote integrity, security, and honest administration in, and accurate
accounting of, the operation of games of chance which are subject to the
act;
(3) Establish criteria to license applicants for authorized gaming
operator licenses and all other types of gaming licenses for other
positions and functions incident to the operation of games of chance,
including adopting, promulgating, and enforcing rules, regulations, and
eligibility standards for such authorized gaming operator licenses,
gaming licenses, and positions and functions incident to the operation of
games of chance;
(4) Charge fees for applications for licenses and for the issuance
of authorized gaming operator licenses and all other types of gaming
licenses to successful applicants which shall be payable to the
commission;
(5) Charge fees to authorized gaming operators in an amount
necessary to offset the cost of oversight and regulatory services to be
provided which shall be payable to the commission;
(6) Impose a one-time authorized gaming operator license fee of five
million dollars on each authorized gaming operator for each licensed
racetrack enclosure payable to the commission. The license fee may be
paid over a period of five years with one million dollars due at the time
the license is issued;
(7) Grant, deny, revoke, and suspend authorized gaming operator
-5-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
licenses and all other types of gaming licenses based upon reasonable
criteria and procedures established by the commission to facilitate the
integrity, productivity, and lawful conduct of gaming within the state;
(8) Grant or deny for cause applications for authorized gaming
operator licenses of not less than twenty years in duration, subject to
an annual review by the commission and receipt by the commission of a
fifty-thousand-dollar annual review fee, with no more than one such
authorized gaming operator license granted for any licensed racetrack
enclosure within the state;
(9) Conduct background investigations of applicants for authorized
gaming operator licenses and all other types of gaming licenses;
(10) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the standards of
manufacture of gaming equipment;
(11) Inspect the operation of any authorized gaming operator
conducting games of chance for the purpose of certifying the revenue
thereof and receiving complaints from the public;
(12) Issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses or the
production of any records, books, memoranda, documents, or other papers
or things at or prior to any hearing as is necessary to enable the
commission to effectively discharge its duties;
(13) Administer oaths or affirmations as necessary to carry out the
act;
(14) Have the authority to impose, subject to judicial review,
appropriate administrative fines and penalties for each violation of the
act or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the
act in an amount not to exceed:
(a) For any licensed racetrack enclosure with an authorized gaming
operator operating games of chance for one year or less, fifty thousand
dollars per violation; or
(b) For any licensed racetrack enclosure with an authorized gaming
operator operating games of chance for more than one year, three times
-6-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
the highest daily amount of gross receipts derived from wagering on games
of chance during the twelve months preceding the violation at such
licensed racetrack enclosure gaming facility per violation;
(15) Collect and remit administrative fines and penalties collected
under this section to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance
with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska;
(16) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for any gaming taxes
assessed to authorized gaming operators;
(17) Collect and account for any gaming taxes assessed to authorized
gaming operators and remit such taxes to the State Treasurer or county
treasurer as required by Nebraska law;
(18) Promote treatment of gaming-related behavioral disorders;
(19) Establish procedures for the governance of the commission;
(20) Acquire necessary offices, facilities, counsel, and staff;
(21) Establish procedures for an applicant for a staff position to
disclose conflicts of interest as part of the application for employment;
(22) Establish a process to allow a person to be voluntarily
excluded from wagering in any game of chance under the act in accordance
with section 9-1118;
(23) Remit all license and application fees collected under the
Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Racing and Gaming Commission's Racetrack Gaming Fund;
(24) Conduct or cause to be conducted a statewide horseracing market
analysis to study the racing market as it currently exists across the
state and within the locations in Nebraska of the racetracks in Adams,
Dakota, Douglas, Hall, Lancaster, and Platte counties as of the date of
the market analysis. Such market analysis shall be completed as soon as
practicable but not later than January 1, 2025, and every five years
thereafter and shall be submitted electronically to the General Affairs
Committee of the Legislature and to the Governor. Such market analysis
shall examine the market potential and make recommendations involving:
-7-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
(a) The number of live racing days per track, number of races run,
and number of horses that should be entered per race;
(b) The number of Nebraska-bred horses available in the market for
running races, including foals dropped in the state for the past three
years at the time of the market analysis;
(c) The circuit scheduled in the state and if any overlapping dates
would be beneficial to the circuit and market as a whole;
(d) The total number of horses available for the total annual
schedule, with separate analysis for thoroughbred races and quarterhorse
races;
(e) The purse money available per race and per track;
(f) The strength of the potential and ongoing simulcast market;
(g) The staffing patterns and problems that exist at each track,
including unfilled positions;
(h) The positive and negative effects, including financial, on each
existing racetrack at the time of the market analysis in the event the
commission approves a new racetrack application;
(i) The potential to attract new owners and horses from other
states;
(j) The market potential for expansion at each licensed racetrack
enclosure to the live race meet days and the number of live horseraces
required by section 2-1205, and the room for expansion, if any, for
additional licensed racetrack enclosures into the market in Nebraska and
the locations most suitable for such expansion; and
(k) Any other data and analysis required by the commission;
(25) Conduct or cause to be conducted a statewide casino gaming
market analysis study across the state and within each location of a
racetrack in Adams, Dakota, Douglas, Hall, Lancaster, and Platte
counties. Such market analysis study shall be completed as soon as
practicable but not later than January 1, 2025, and every five years
thereafter and shall be submitted electronically to the General Affairs
-8-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
Committee of the Legislature and to the Governor. The market analysis
study shall include:
(a) A comprehensive assessment of the potential casino gaming market
conditions;
(b) An evaluation of the effects on the Nebraska market from
competitive casino gaming locations outside of the state;
(c) Information identifying underperforming or underserved markets
within Nebraska;
(d) A comprehensive study of potential casino gaming revenue in
Nebraska; and
(e) Any other data and analysis required by the commission;
(26) Conduct or cause to be conducted a statewide socioeconomic-
impact study of horseracing and casino gaming across the state and at
each licensed racetrack enclosure and gaming facility in Adams, Dakota,
Douglas, Hall, Lancaster, and Platte counties. Such socioeconomic-impact
study shall be completed as soon as practicable but not later than
January 1, 2025, and shall be submitted electronically to the General
Affairs Committee of the Legislature and to the Governor. The study shall
include:
(a) Information on financial and societal impacts of horseracing and
casino gaming, including crime and local businesses;
(b) An analysis of problem gambling within the state; and
(c) A comparison of the economy of counties which contain a licensed
racetrack enclosure operating games of chance and counties which do not
contain such a licensed racetrack enclosure as of the date of the study,
which comparison shall include:
(i) The population of such counties;
(ii) Jobs created by each licensed racetrack enclosure operating
games of chance in such counties;
(iii) Unemployment rates in such counties;
(iv) Information on family and household income in such counties;
-9-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
(v) Retail sales in such counties;
(vi) Property values in such counties;
(vii) An analysis of the impact on community services, including
police protection expenditures, fire protection expenditures, road,
bridge, and sidewalk expenditures, and capital project expenditures in
such counties;
(viii) Impact on community health in such counties;
(ix) Divorce rates in such counties;
(x) Information on available education and education levels in such
counties;
(xi) Life expectancy in such counties;
(xii) Homelessness in such counties; and
(xiii) Any other data and analysis required by the commission;
(27) Approve or deny an application for any licensed racetrack
enclosure which is not in existence or operational as of April 20, 2022,
or any licensed racetrack enclosure in existence and operational as of
November 1, 2020, that applies to move such licensed racetrack enclosure
pursuant to section 2-1205, on the basis of the placement and location of
such licensed racetrack enclosure and based on the market as it exists as
of the most recent issuance of the statewide horseracing market analysis,
statewide casino gaming market analysis, and statewide socioeconomic-
impact studies conducted by the commission pursuant to this section. The
commission shall deny a licensed racetrack enclosure or gaming operator
license application if it finds that approval of such application in such
placement and location would be detrimental to the racing or gaming
market that exists across the state based on the most recent statewide
horseracing market analysis, statewide casino gaming market analysis, and
statewide socioeconomic-impact studies;
(28) Do all things necessary and proper to carry out its powers and
duties under the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act, including the adoption
and promulgation of rules and regulations and such other actions as
-10-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
permitted by the Administrative Procedure Act;
(29) Recommend to the Governor and to the General Affairs Committee
of the Legislature amendments to all laws administered by the commission;
and
(30) As appropriate and as recommended by the executive director of
the commission, delegate to an adjudication subcommittee of the
commission those powers and duties of the commission as necessary to
carry out and effectuate the purposes of the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming
Act and investigate and respond to violations of the Nebraska Racetrack
Gaming Act. The adjudication subcommittee staff shall be appointed by the
executive director. No person may be appointed to the adjudication
subcommittee if such person is involved in the investigation of any
violation being heard or investigated by the subcommittee. Any action of
the adjudication subcommittee may be appealed to the commission or may be
reviewed by the commission on its own initiative. The adjudication
subcommittee may impose a fine, consistent with the Nebraska Racetrack
Gaming Act, not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars, upon a finding that
the act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated under the act
has been violated. The commission shall remit any fines collected under
this subdivision to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance
with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska; and .
(31) Examine rules and regulations from other states relating to
online sports wagering and, if practicable, adopt a similar regulatory
framework through the adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations
for online sports wagering.
Sec. 3. Section 9-1110, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-1110 (1)(a)(i) (1) The commission may permit an authorized gaming
operator to conduct sports wagering. All sports wagering shall be
conducted by an authorized gaming operator located within a licensed
racetrack enclosure or in partnership with such authorized gaming
-11-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
operator pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of this section. Any sports wager
shall be placed (A) in person or at a wagering kiosk in the designated
sports wagering area at the licensed racetrack enclosure or (B) by means
of an online sports wagering platform that is offered by or in
partnership with an authorized gaming operator by an individual that is
located in the State of Nebraska. Servers, including backup servers, used
for online sports wagering may be located outside of this state, but to
the extent required by federal law, an authorized gaming operator or
platform provider shall maintain in this state the servers it uses to
accept a sports wager placed by an individual located in this state.
(ii) A parimutuel wager in accordance with sections 2-1201 to 2-1218
may be placed in the designated sports wagering area at the licensed
racetrack enclosure. An individual employed and authorized to accept a
sports wager may also accept a parimutuel wager.
(b)(i) An authorized gaming operator may conduct sports wagering by
means of one online sports wagering platform and may contract with one
platform provider for purposes of providing sports wagering. An
individual or entity that does not have a contract with an authorized
gaming operator to conduct sports wagering by means of an online sports
wagering platform shall not be permitted to conduct sports wagering in
the State of Nebraska. Any sports wagering conducted by means of an
online sports wagering platform shall conform to all requirements
relating to sports wagering pursuant to the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act
and any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act.
(ii) An authorized gaming operator or a platform provider that has
contracted with an authorized gaming operator shall submit controls to
the commission for approval in a manner prescribed by the commission
relating to any online sports wagering platform that the authorized
gaming operator or the platform provider intends to use to conduct sports
wagering by means of an online sports wagering platform. The commission
shall announce a date on which it shall begin to accept controls relating
-12-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
to online sports wagering platforms, which shall be no later than thirty
days after the commission adopts and promulgates rules and regulations
relating to online sports wagering. The commission shall have thirty days
to review and approve or deny proposed controls submitted by an
authorized gaming operator or a platform provider that has contracted
with an authorized gaming operator. All authorized gaming operators or
platform providers that have contracted with an authorized gaming
operator that submit controls within thirty days of the date on which the
commission first begins to accept controls, if such controls are
approved, shall be given an equal opportunity to commence offering and
conducting online sports wagering on the same day, which shall be no
later than sixty days from the date that the commission first begins to
accept controls. No authorized gaming operator or platform provider shall
conduct sports wagering by means of an online sports wagering platform
until the controls for such online sports wagering platform are approved
by the commission.
(2) A floor plan identifying the designated sports wagering area,
including the location of any wagering kiosks, shall be filed with the
commission for review and approval. Modification to a previously approved
plan must be submitted for approval at least ten days prior to
implementation. The area shall not be accessible to persons under twenty-
one years of age and shall have a sign posted to restrict access.
Exceptions to this subsection must be approved in writing by the
commission.
(3) The authorized gaming operator shall submit controls for
approval by the commission, that include the following for operating the
designated sports wagering area:
(a) Specific procedures and technology partners to fulfill the
requirements set forth by the commission;
(b) Other specific controls as designated by the commission;
(c) A process to easily and prominently impose limitations or
-13-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
notification for wagering parameters, including, but not limited to,
deposits and wagers; and
(d) An easy and obvious method for a player to make a complaint and
to enable the player to notify the commission if such complaint has not
been or cannot be addressed by the sports wagering operator.
(4) The commission shall develop policies and procedures to ensure a
prohibited participant is unable to place a sports wager or parimutuel
wager.
(5) Beginning on the implementation date designated by the Tax
Commissioner pursuant to subsection (1) of section 9-1312, prior to the
winnings payment of any sports wagering winnings as defined in section
9-1303, an authorized gaming operator shall check the collection system
to determine if the winner has a debt or an outstanding state tax
liability as required by the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding
Debt Act. If such authorized gaming operator determines that the winner
is subject to the collection system, the operator shall deduct the amount
of debt and outstanding state tax liability identified in the collection
system from the winnings payment and shall remit the net winnings payment
of sports wagering winnings, if any, to the winner and the amount
deducted to the Department of Revenue to be credited against such debt or
outstanding state tax liability as provided in section 9-1306.
Sec. 4. Section 9-1204, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-1204 (1) Of the tax imposed by section 9-1203 on gross gaming
revenue not generated by sports wagering, seventy-five percent shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit as follows: Two and one-half
percent to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance Fund, two and one-half
percent to the General Fund, and seventy percent to the Property Tax
Credit Cash Fund. The remaining twenty-five percent of the tax shall be
remitted to the county treasurer of the county in which the licensed
racetrack enclosure is located to be distributed as follows: (a) (1) If
-14-

LB421 LB421
2025 2025
the licensed racetrack enclosure is located completely within an
unincorporated area of a county, the remaining twenty-five percent shall
be distributed to the county in which such licensed racetrack enclosure
is located; or (b) (2) if the licensed racetrack enclosure is located at
least partially within the limits of a city or village in such county,
one-half of the remaining twenty-five percent shall be distributed to
such county and one-half of the remaining twenty-five percent to the city
or village in which such licensed racetrack enclosure is at least
partially located.
(2) The tax imposed by section 9-1203 on gross gaming revenue
generated by sports wagering shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit as follows: Three percent to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance
Fund, three and one-half percent to the Racing and Gaming Commission's
Racetrack Gaming Fund, three and one-half percent to the Racing and
Gaming Commission's Racing Cash Fund, and ninety percent to the Property
Tax Credit Cash Fund.
Sec. 5. This act becomes operative on September 1, 2025.
Sec. 6. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 7. Original section 9-1204, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 9-1103, 9-1106, and 9-1110, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 8. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-15-